South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3656.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-1-320.  The Department of Environmental Services shall not deny a property owner the right to repair and replace any well or septic tank existing on the effective date of this act solely because of any other available water or sewer service, or both. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----